Hawaii statutes.
§128D-23 Exemption from state and county
permits. No state or county permit shall be required for the portion of
any removal or remedial action conducted entirely on site where such response
action is carried out in compliance with this chapter, or where such removal or
remedial action is in response to a release of a hazardous substance or
pollutant or contaminant that occurred in or on the coastal waters of the State
and such removal or remedial action is carried out in compliance with this
chapter, the National Contingency Plan, or at the direction of a federal or
state on-scene coordinator. [L 1991, c 280, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 324, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next